North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36A. Trusts and Trustees.
Article 2. Removal of Fiduciary Funds. [Repealed]

§§ 36A-13 through 36A-16.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.

Cross References.

For present provisions as to trusts and trustees, see Chapter 36C, the Uniform Trust Code,

G.S. 36C-1-101

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

Prior to repeal of this Article, G.S. 36A-17 through 36A-21 had been set out as reserved for future codification purposes.